District of Columbia statutes.
16-1905

Right to copy of commitment; forfeiture.

A person committed or detained, or a person in his behalf, may demand a true copy of the warrant of commitment or detainer. An officer or other person detaining a person, who refuses or neglects to deliver to him or to a person in his behalf a true copy of the warrant of commitment or detainer, if one exists, within six hours after the demand, shall forfeit to the party so detained the sum of $500.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 584, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1905.
1973 Ed., § 16-1905.